Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-3] License required.
(a) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, no person shall engage in
the practice of respiratory care or use the title "licensed respiratory
therapist" or "respiratory therapist" without a valid license
issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 for each separate offense. Each
day of each violation shall constitute a separate offense. The director may
initiate a civil action to collect the fine imposed under this section in
accordance with rules adopted by the director. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next